Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,136
Limitations on overtaking, passing, or driving to the left of the center of roadway; when prohibited.

(1) No driver shall overtake and pass another vehicle or drive to the left of the center of the roadway whenever:

(a) He or she approaches the crest of a grade or is upon a curve in the highway where the driver's view is obstructed within such distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction;

(b) He or she approaches within one hundred feet of or traverses any intersection or railroad grade crossing;

(c) The view is obstructed when he or she approaches within one hundred feet of any bridge, viaduct, or tunnel; or

(d) The section of roadway is designated as a no-passing zone under section 60-6,137.

(2) The limitations imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not apply (a) upon a one-way roadway, (b) under the conditions described in subdivision (1)(b) of section 60-6,131, or (c) to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road, or driveway unless otherwise prohibited by signs.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-625;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 232.

A driver is negligent as a matter of law if he makes a left turn between intersections without signaling. Ben Gay, Inc., v. Giesbrecht, 720 F.2d 1003 (8th Cir. 1983).